Illinois, session 104th, SB190.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1603)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires: 9    (a) "Board" means the Illinois Labor Relations Board or, 10with respect to a matter over which the jurisdiction of the 11Board is assigned to the State Panel or the Local Panel under 12Section 5, the panel having jurisdiction over the matter. 13    (b) "Collective bargaining" means bargaining over terms 14and conditions of employment, including hours, wages, and 15other conditions of employment, as detailed in Section 7 and 16which are not excluded by Section 4. 17    (c) "Confidential employee" means an employee who, in the 18regular course of his or her duties, assists and acts in a 19confidential capacity to persons who formulate, determine, and 20effectuate management policies with regard to labor relations 21or who, in the regular course of his or her duties, has 22authorized access to information relating to the effectuation 23or review of the employer's collective bargaining policies.   SB0190- 2 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1Determinations of confidential employee status shall be based 2on actual employee job duties and not solely on written job 3descriptions.4    (d) "Craft employees" means skilled journeymen, crafts 5persons, and their apprentices and helpers. 6    (e) "Essential services employees" means those public 7employees performing functions so essential that the 8interruption or termination of the function will constitute a 9clear and present danger to the health and safety of the 10persons in the affected community. 11    (f) "Exclusive representative", except with respect to 12non-State fire fighters and paramedics employed by fire 13departments and fire protection districts, non-State peace 14officers, and peace officers in the Illinois State Police, 15means the labor organization that has been (i) designated by 16the Board as the representative of a majority of public 17employees in an appropriate bargaining unit in accordance with 18the procedures contained in this Act; (ii) historically 19recognized by the State of Illinois or any political 20subdivision of the State before July 1, 1984 (the effective 21date of this Act) as the exclusive representative of the 22employees in an appropriate bargaining unit; (iii) after July 231, 1984 (the effective date of this Act) recognized by an 24employer upon evidence, acceptable to the Board, that the 25labor organization has been designated as the exclusive 26representative by a majority of the employees in an   SB0190- 3 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1appropriate bargaining unit; (iv) recognized as the exclusive 2representative of personal assistants under Executive Order 32003-8 prior to July 16, 2003 (the effective date of Public Act 493-204), and the organization shall be considered to be the 5exclusive representative of the personal assistants as defined 6in this Section; or (v) recognized as the exclusive 7representative of child and day care home providers, including 8licensed and license exempt providers, pursuant to an election 9held under Executive Order 2005-1 prior to January 1, 2006 10(the effective date of Public Act 94-320), and the 11organization shall be considered to be the exclusive 12representative of the child and day care home providers as 13defined in this Section. 14    With respect to non-State fire fighters and paramedics 15employed by fire departments and fire protection districts, 16non-State peace officers, and peace officers in the Illinois 17State Police, "exclusive representative" means the labor 18organization that has been (i) designated by the Board as the 19representative of a majority of peace officers or fire 20fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit in accordance with 21the procedures contained in this Act, (ii) historically 22recognized by the State of Illinois or any political 23subdivision of the State before January 1, 1986 (the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of 1985) as the exclusive 25representative by a majority of the peace officers or fire 26fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit, or (iii) after   SB0190- 4 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1January 1, 1986 (the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21985) recognized by an employer upon evidence, acceptable to 3the Board, that the labor organization has been designated as 4the exclusive representative by a majority of the peace 5officers or fire fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit. 6    Where a historical pattern of representation exists for 7the workers of a water system that was owned by a public 8utility, as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities 9Act, prior to becoming certified employees of a municipality 10or municipalities once the municipality or municipalities have 11acquired the water system as authorized in Section 11-124-5 of 12the Illinois Municipal Code, the Board shall find the labor 13organization that has historically represented the workers to 14be the exclusive representative under this Act, and shall find 15the unit represented by the exclusive representative to be the 16appropriate unit. 17    (g) "Fair share agreement" means an agreement between the 18employer and an employee organization under which all or any 19of the employees in a collective bargaining unit are required 20to pay their proportionate share of the costs of the 21collective bargaining process, contract administration, and 22pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions 23of employment, but not to exceed the amount of dues uniformly 24required of members. The amount certified by the exclusive 25representative shall not include any fees for contributions 26related to the election or support of any candidate for   SB0190- 5 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1political office. Nothing in this subsection (g) shall 2preclude an employee from making voluntary political 3contributions in conjunction with his or her fair share 4payment. 5    (g-1) "Fire fighter" means, for the purposes of this Act 6only, any person who has been or is hereafter appointed to a 7fire department or fire protection district or employed by a 8state university and sworn or commissioned to perform fire 9fighter duties or paramedic duties, including paramedics 10employed by a unit of local government, except that the 11following persons are not included: part-time fire fighters, 12auxiliary, reserve or voluntary fire fighters, including paid 13on-call fire fighters, clerks and dispatchers or other 14civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 15district who are not routinely expected to perform fire 16fighter duties, or elected officials. 17    (g-2) "General Assembly of the State of Illinois" means 18the legislative branch of the government of the State of 19Illinois, as provided for under Article IV of the Constitution 20of the State of Illinois, and includes, but is not limited to, 21the House of Representatives, the Senate, the Speaker of the 22House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the House of 23Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Minority 24Leader of the Senate, the Joint Committee on Legislative 25Support Services, and any legislative support services agency 26listed in the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of   SB0190- 6 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b11984. 2    (h) "Governing body" means, in the case of the State, the 3State Panel of the Illinois Labor Relations Board, the 4Director of the Department of Central Management Services, and 5the Director of the Department of Labor; the county board in 6the case of a county; the corporate authorities in the case of 7a municipality; and the appropriate body authorized to provide 8for expenditures of its funds in the case of any other unit of 9government. 10    (i) "Labor organization" means any organization in which 11public employees participate and that exists for the purpose, 12in whole or in part, of dealing with a public employer 13concerning wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of 14employment, including the settlement of grievances. 15    (i-5) "Legislative liaison" means a person who is an 16employee of a State agency, the Attorney General, the 17Secretary of State, the Comptroller, or the Treasurer, as the 18case may be, and whose job duties require the person to 19regularly communicate in the course of his or her employment 20with any official or staff of the General Assembly of the State 21of Illinois for the purpose of influencing any legislative 22action.23    (j) "Managerial employee" means an individual who is 24engaged predominantly in executive and management functions 25and is charged with the responsibility of directing the 26effectuation of management policies and practices.   SB0190- 7 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1Determination of managerial employee status shall be based on 2actual employee job duties and not solely on written job 3descriptions. 4    With respect only to State employees in positions under 5the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, Secretary of State, 6Comptroller, or Treasurer (i) that were certified in a 7bargaining unit on or after December 2, 2008, (ii) for which a 8petition is filed with the Illinois Public Labor Relations 9Board on or after April 5, 2013 (the effective date of Public 10Act 97-1172), or (iii) for which a petition is pending before 11the Illinois Public Labor Relations Board on that date, 12"managerial employee" means an individual who is engaged in 13executive and management functions or who is charged with the 14effectuation of management policies and practices or who 15represents management interests by taking or recommending 16discretionary actions that effectively control or implement 17policy. 18    Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 19the 104th General Assembly, "managerial employee" includes an 20individual designated or appointed by a sheriff as the 21undersheriff or chief deputy to fill a vacancy under Section 223-3010 of the Counties Code or an individual serving as the 23superintendent of the jail under Section 3 of the County Jail 24Act unless the sheriff and the relevant union have mutually 25agreed otherwise or the individual is otherwise recognized 26under Section 9.   SB0190- 8 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1    Nothing in this definition prohibits an individual from 2also meeting the definition of "supervisor" under subsection 3(r) of this Section. 4    (k) "Peace officer" means, for the purposes of this Act 5only, any persons who have been or are hereafter appointed to a 6police force, department, or agency and sworn or commissioned 7to perform police duties, except that the following persons 8are not included: part-time police officers, special police 9officers, auxiliary police as defined by Section 3.1-30-20 of 10the Illinois Municipal Code, night watchmen, "merchant 11police", court security officers as defined by Section 123-6012.1 of the Counties Code, temporary employees, traffic 13guards or wardens, civilian parking meter and parking 14facilities personnel or other individuals specially appointed 15to aid or direct traffic at or near schools or public functions 16or to aid in civil defense or disaster, parking enforcement 17employees who are not commissioned as peace officers and who 18are not armed and who are not routinely expected to effect 19arrests, parking lot attendants, clerks and dispatchers or 20other civilian employees of a police department who are not 21routinely expected to effect arrests, or elected officials. 22    (l) "Person" includes one or more individuals, labor 23organizations, public employees, associations, corporations, 24legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, 25receivers, or the State of Illinois or any political 26subdivision of the State or governing body, but does not   SB0190- 9 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1include the General Assembly of the State of Illinois or any 2individual employed by the General Assembly of the State of 3Illinois. 4    (m) "Professional employee" means any employee engaged in 5work predominantly intellectual and varied in character rather 6than routine mental, manual, mechanical or physical work; 7involving the consistent exercise of discretion and adjustment 8in its performance; of such a character that the output 9produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in 10relation to a given period of time; and requiring advanced 11knowledge in a field of science or learning customarily 12acquired by a prolonged course of specialized intellectual 13instruction and study in an institution of higher learning or 14a hospital, as distinguished from a general academic education 15or from apprenticeship or from training in the performance of 16routine mental, manual, or physical processes; or any employee 17who has completed the courses of specialized intellectual 18instruction and study prescribed in this subsection (m) and is 19performing related work under the supervision of a 20professional person to qualify to become a professional 21employee as defined in this subsection (m). 22    (n) "Public employee" or "employee", for the purposes of 23this Act, means any individual employed by a public employer, 24including (i) interns and residents at public hospitals, (ii) 25as of July 16, 2003 (the effective date of Public Act 93-204), 26but not before, personal assistants working under the Home   SB0190- 10 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1Services Program under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of 2Persons with Disabilities Act, subject to the limitations set 3forth in this Act and in the Rehabilitation of Persons with 4Disabilities Act, (iii) as of January 1, 2006 (the effective 5date of Public Act 94-320), but not before, child and day care 6home providers participating in the child care assistance 7program under Section 9A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, 8subject to the limitations set forth in this Act and in Section 99A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, (iv) as of January 29, 102013 (the effective date of Public Act 97-1158), but not 11before except as otherwise provided in this subsection (n), 12home care and home health workers who function as personal 13assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and 14who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 15of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, no 16matter whether the State provides those services through 17direct fee-for-service arrangements, with the assistance of a 18managed care organization or other intermediary, or otherwise, 19(v) beginning on July 19, 2013 (the effective date of Public 20Act 98-100) and notwithstanding any other provision of this 21Act, any person employed by a public employer and who is 22classified as or who holds the employment title of Chief 23Stationary Engineer, Assistant Chief Stationary Engineer, 24Sewage Plant Operator, Water Plant Operator, Stationary 25Engineer, Plant Operating Engineer, and any other employee who 26holds the position of: Civil Engineer V, Civil Engineer VI,   SB0190- 11 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1Civil Engineer VII, Technical Manager I, Technical Manager II, 2Technical Manager III, Technical Manager IV, Technical Manager 3V, Technical Manager VI, Realty Specialist III, Realty 4Specialist IV, Realty Specialist V, Technical Advisor I, 5Technical Advisor II, Technical Advisor III, Technical Advisor 6IV, or Technical Advisor V employed by the Department of 7Transportation who is in a position which is certified in a 8bargaining unit on or before July 19, 2013 (the effective date 9of Public Act 98-100), and (vi) beginning on July 19, 2013 (the 10effective date of Public Act 98-100) and notwithstanding any 11other provision of this Act, any mental health administrator 12in the Department of Corrections who is classified as or who 13holds the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 148K), any employee of the Office of the Inspector General in the 15Department of Human Services who is classified as or who holds 16the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 7), any 17Deputy of Intelligence in the Department of Corrections who is 18classified as or who holds the position of Public Service 19Administrator (Option 7), and any employee of the Illinois 20State Police who handles issues concerning the Illinois State 21Police Sex Offender Registry and who is classified as or holds 22the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 7), but 23excluding all of the following: employees of the General 24Assembly of the State of Illinois; elected officials; 25executive heads of a department; members of boards or 26commissions; the Executive Inspectors General; any special   SB0190- 12 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1Executive Inspectors General; employees of each Office of an 2Executive Inspector General; commissioners and employees of 3the Executive Ethics Commission; the Auditor General's 4Inspector General; employees of the Office of the Auditor 5General's Inspector General; the Legislative Inspector 6General; any special Legislative Inspectors General; employees 7of the Office of the Legislative Inspector General; 8commissioners and employees of the Legislative Ethics 9Commission; employees of any agency, board or commission 10created by this Act; employees appointed to State positions of 11a temporary or emergency nature; all employees of school 12districts and higher education institutions except 13firefighters and peace officers employed by a state university 14and except peace officers employed by a school district in its 15own police department in existence on July 23, 2010 (the 16effective date of Public Act 96-1257); managerial employees; 17short-term employees; legislative liaisons; a person who is a 18State employee under the jurisdiction of the Office of the 19Attorney General who is licensed to practice law or whose 20position authorizes, either directly or indirectly, meaningful 21input into government decision-making on issues where there is 22room for principled disagreement on goals or their 23implementation; a person who is a State employee under the 24jurisdiction of the Office of the Comptroller who holds the 25position of Public Service Administrator or whose position is 26otherwise exempt under the Comptroller Merit Employment Code;   SB0190- 13 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1a person who is a State employee under the jurisdiction of the 2Secretary of State who holds the position classification of 3Executive I or higher, whose position authorizes, either 4directly or indirectly, meaningful input into government 5decision-making on issues where there is room for principled 6disagreement on goals or their implementation, or who is 7otherwise exempt under the Secretary of State Merit Employment 8Code; employees in the Office of the Secretary of State who are 9completely exempt from jurisdiction B of the Secretary of 10State Merit Employment Code and who are in Rutan-exempt 11positions on or after April 5, 2013 (the effective date of 12Public Act 97-1172); a person who is a State employee under the 13jurisdiction of the Treasurer who holds a position that is 14exempt from the State Treasurer Employment Code; any employee 15of a State agency who (i) holds the title or position of, or 16exercises substantially similar duties as a legislative 17liaison, Agency General Counsel, Agency Chief of Staff, Agency 18Executive Director, Agency Deputy Director, Agency Chief 19Fiscal Officer, Agency Human Resources Director, Public 20Information Officer, or Chief Information Officer and (ii) was 21neither included in a bargaining unit nor subject to an active 22petition for certification in a bargaining unit; any employee 23of a State agency who (i) is in a position that is 24Rutan-exempt, as designated by the employer, and completely 25exempt from jurisdiction B of the Personnel Code and (ii) was 26neither included in a bargaining unit nor subject to an active   SB0190- 14 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1petition for certification in a bargaining unit; any term 2appointed employee of a State agency pursuant to Section 8b.18 3or 8b.19 of the Personnel Code who was neither included in a 4bargaining unit nor subject to an active petition for 5certification in a bargaining unit; any employment position 6properly designated pursuant to Section 6.1 of this Act; 7confidential employees; independent contractors; and 8supervisors except as provided in this Act. 9    Home care and home health workers who function as personal 10assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and 11who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 12of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act shall 13not be considered public employees for any purposes not 14specifically provided for in Public Act 93-204 or Public Act 1597-1158, including, but not limited to, purposes of vicarious 16liability in tort and purposes of statutory retirement or 17health insurance benefits. Home care and home health workers 18who function as personal assistants and individual maintenance 19home health workers and who also work under the Home Services 20Program under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of Persons with 21Disabilities Act shall not be covered by the State Employees 22Group Insurance Act of 1971. 23    Child and day care home providers shall not be considered 24public employees for any purposes not specifically provided 25for in Public Act 94-320, including, but not limited to, 26purposes of vicarious liability in tort and purposes of   SB0190- 15 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1statutory retirement or health insurance benefits. Child and 2day care home providers shall not be covered by the State 3Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971.4    Notwithstanding Section 9, subsection (c), or any other 5provisions of this Act, all peace officers above the rank of 6captain in municipalities with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants 7shall be excluded from this Act. 8    (o) Except as otherwise in subsection (o-5), "public 9employer" or "employer" means the State of Illinois; any 10political subdivision of the State, unit of local government 11or school district; authorities including departments, 12divisions, bureaus, boards, commissions, or other agencies of 13the foregoing entities; and any person acting within the scope 14of his or her authority, express or implied, on behalf of those 15entities in dealing with its employees. As of July 16, 2003 16(the effective date of Public Act 93-204), but not before, the 17State of Illinois shall be considered the employer of the 18personal assistants working under the Home Services Program 19under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of Persons with 20Disabilities Act, subject to the limitations set forth in this 21Act and in the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities 22Act. As of January 29, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 2397-1158), but not before except as otherwise provided in this 24subsection (o), the State shall be considered the employer of 25home care and home health workers who function as personal 26assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and   SB0190- 16 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 2of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, no 3matter whether the State provides those services through 4direct fee-for-service arrangements, with the assistance of a 5managed care organization or other intermediary, or otherwise, 6but subject to the limitations set forth in this Act and the 7Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act. The State 8shall not be considered to be the employer of home care and 9home health workers who function as personal assistants and 10individual maintenance home health workers and who also work 11under the Home Services Program under Section 3 of the 12Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, for any 13purposes not specifically provided for in Public Act 93-204 or 14Public Act 97-1158, including but not limited to, purposes of 15vicarious liability in tort and purposes of statutory 16retirement or health insurance benefits. Home care and home 17health workers who function as personal assistants and 18individual maintenance home health workers and who also work 19under the Home Services Program under Section 3 of the 20Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act shall not be 21covered by the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971. As 22of January 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-320), 23but not before, the State of Illinois shall be considered the 24employer of the day and child care home providers 25participating in the child care assistance program under 26Section 9A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, subject to the   SB0190- 17 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1limitations set forth in this Act and in Section 9A-11 of the 2Illinois Public Aid Code. The State shall not be considered to 3be the employer of child and day care home providers for any 4purposes not specifically provided for in Public Act 94-320, 5including, but not limited to, purposes of vicarious liability 6in tort and purposes of statutory retirement or health 7insurance benefits. Child and day care home providers shall 8not be covered by the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 91971.10    "Public employer" or "employer" as used in this Act, 11however, does not mean and shall not include the General 12Assembly of the State of Illinois, the Executive Ethics 13Commission, the Offices of the Executive Inspectors General, 14the Legislative Ethics Commission, the Office of the 15Legislative Inspector General, the Office of the Auditor 16General's Inspector General, the Office of the Governor, the 17Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the Illinois 18Finance Authority, the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, the 19State Board of Elections, and educational employers or 20employers as defined in the Illinois Educational Labor 21Relations Act, except with respect to a state university in 22its employment of firefighters and peace officers and except 23with respect to a school district in the employment of peace 24officers in its own police department in existence on July 23, 252010 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1257). County boards 26and county sheriffs shall be designated as joint or   SB0190- 18 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1co-employers of county peace officers appointed under the 2authority of a county sheriff. Nothing in this subsection (o) 3shall be construed to prevent the State Panel or the Local 4Panel from determining that employers are joint or 5co-employers. 6    (o-5) With respect to wages, fringe benefits, hours, 7holidays, vacations, proficiency examinations, sick leave, and 8other conditions of employment, the public employer of public 9employees who are court reporters, as defined in the Court 10Reporters Act, shall be determined as follows: 11        (1) For court reporters employed by the Cook County 12    Judicial Circuit, the chief judge of the Cook County 13    Circuit Court is the public employer and employer 14    representative. 15        (2) For court reporters employed by the 12th, 18th, 16    19th, and, on and after December 4, 2006, the 22nd 17    judicial circuits, a group consisting of the chief judges 18    of those circuits, acting jointly by majority vote, is the 19    public employer and employer representative. 20        (3) For court reporters employed by all other judicial 21    circuits, a group consisting of the chief judges of those 22    circuits, acting jointly by majority vote, is the public 23    employer and employer representative. 24    (p) "Security employee" means an employee who is 25responsible for the supervision and control of inmates at 26correctional facilities. The term also includes other   SB0190- 19 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1non-security employees in bargaining units having the majority 2of employees being responsible for the supervision and control 3of inmates at correctional facilities. 4    (q) "Short-term employee" means an employee who is 5employed for less than 2 consecutive calendar quarters during 6a calendar year and who does not have a reasonable assurance 7that he or she will be rehired by the same employer for the 8same service in a subsequent calendar year. 9    (q-5) "State agency" means an agency directly responsible 10to the Governor, as defined in Section 3.1 of the Executive 11Reorganization Implementation Act, and the Illinois Commerce 12Commission, the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission, the 13Civil Service Commission, the Pollution Control Board, the 14Illinois Racing Board, and the Illinois State Police Merit 15Board. 16    (r) "Supervisor" is:17        (1) An employee whose principal work is substantially 18    different from that of his or her subordinates and who has 19    authority, in the interest of the employer, to hire, 20    transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, 21    direct, reward, or discipline employees, to adjust their 22    grievances, or to effectively recommend any of those 23    actions, if the exercise of that authority is not of a 24    merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the 25    consistent use of independent judgment. The Except with 26    respect to police employment, the term "supervisor"   SB0190- 20 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1    includes only those individuals who devote a preponderance 2    of their employment time to exercising that authority, 3    State supervisors and sworn State police officers 4    notwithstanding. Determinations of supervisor status shall 5    be based on actual employee job duties and not solely on 6    written job descriptions. Nothing in this definition 7    prohibits an individual from also meeting the definition 8    of "managerial employee" under subsection (j) of this 9    Section. In addition, in determining supervisory status in 10    police employment, rank shall not be determinative. The 11    Board shall consider, as evidence of bargaining unit 12    inclusion or exclusion, the common law enforcement 13    policies and relationships between police officer ranks 14    and certification under applicable civil service law, 15    ordinances, personnel codes, or Division 2.1 of Article 10 16    of the Illinois Municipal Code, or Division 3.8 of Article 17    3 of the Counties Code, but these factors shall not be the 18    sole or predominant factors considered by the Board in 19    determining police supervisory status. 20        Notwithstanding the provisions of the preceding 21    paragraph, in determining supervisory status in fire 22    fighter employment, no fire fighter shall be excluded as a 23    supervisor who has established representation rights under 24    Section 9 of this Act. Further, in fire fighter units, 25    employees shall consist of fire fighters of the highest 26    rank of company officer and below. A company officer may   SB0190- 21 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1    be responsible for multiple companies or apparatus on a 2    shift, multiple stations, or an entire shift. There may be 3    more than one company officer per shift. If a company 4    officer otherwise qualifies as a supervisor under the 5    preceding paragraph, however, he or she shall not be 6    included in the fire fighter unit. If there is no rank 7    between that of chief and the highest company officer, the 8    employer may designate a position on each shift as a Shift 9    Commander, and the persons occupying those positions shall 10    be supervisors. All other ranks above that of the highest 11    company officer shall be supervisors. 12        (2) With respect only to State employees in positions 13    under the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, Secretary 14    of State, Comptroller, or Treasurer (i) that were 15    certified in a bargaining unit on or after December 2, 16    2008, (ii) for which a petition is filed with the Illinois 17    Public Labor Relations Board on or after April 5, 2013 18    (the effective date of Public Act 97-1172), or (iii) for 19    which a petition is pending before the Illinois Public 20    Labor Relations Board on that date, an employee who 21    qualifies as a supervisor under (A) Section 152 of the 22    National Labor Relations Act and (B) orders of the 23    National Labor Relations Board interpreting that provision 24    or decisions of courts reviewing decisions of the National 25    Labor Relations Board. 26    (s)(1) "Unit" means a class of jobs or positions that are   SB0190- 22 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1held by employees whose collective interests may suitably be 2represented by a labor organization for collective bargaining. 3Except with respect to non-State fire fighters and paramedics 4employed by fire departments and fire protection districts, 5non-State peace officers, and peace officers in the Illinois 6State Police, a bargaining unit determined by the Board shall 7not include both employees and supervisors, or supervisors 8only, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection 9(s) and except for bargaining units in existence on July 1, 101984 (the effective date of this Act). With respect to 11non-State fire fighters and paramedics employed by fire 12departments and fire protection districts, non-State peace 13officers, and peace officers in the Illinois State Police, a 14bargaining unit determined by the Board shall not include both 15supervisors and nonsupervisors, or supervisors only, except as 16provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection (s) and except 17for bargaining units in existence on January 1, 1986 (the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of 1985). A bargaining 19unit determined by the Board to contain peace officers shall 20contain no employees other than peace officers unless 21otherwise agreed to by the employer and the labor organization 22or labor organizations involved. Notwithstanding any other 23provision of this Act, a bargaining unit, including a 24historical bargaining unit, containing sworn peace officers of 25the Department of Natural Resources (formerly designated the 26Department of Conservation) shall contain no employees other   SB0190- 23 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1than such sworn peace officers upon the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of 1990 or upon the expiration date of any 3collective bargaining agreement in effect upon the effective 4date of this amendatory Act of 1990 covering both such sworn 5peace officers and other employees. 6    (2) Notwithstanding the exclusion of supervisors from 7bargaining units as provided in paragraph (1) of this 8subsection (s), a public employer may agree to permit its 9supervisory employees to form bargaining units and may bargain 10with those units. This Act shall apply if the public employer 11chooses to bargain under this subsection. 12    (3) Public employees who are court reporters, as defined 13in the Court Reporters Act, shall be divided into 3 units for 14collective bargaining purposes. One unit shall be court 15reporters employed by the Cook County Judicial Circuit; one 16unit shall be court reporters employed by the 12th, 18th, 1719th, and, on and after December 4, 2006, the 22nd judicial 18circuits; and one unit shall be court reporters employed by 19all other judicial circuits. 20    (t) "Active petition for certification in a bargaining 21unit" means a petition for certification filed with the Board 22under one of the following case numbers: S-RC-11-110; 23S-RC-11-098; S-UC-11-080; S-RC-11-086; S-RC-11-074; 24S-RC-11-076; S-RC-11-078; S-UC-11-052; S-UC-11-054; 25S-RC-11-062; S-RC-11-060; S-RC-11-042; S-RC-11-014; 26S-RC-11-016; S-RC-11-020; S-RC-11-030; S-RC-11-004;   SB0190- 24 -LRB104 06898 BDA 16934 b1S-RC-10-244; S-RC-10-228; S-RC-10-222; S-RC-10-220; 2S-RC-10-214; S-RC-10-196; S-RC-10-194; S-RC-10-178; 3S-RC-10-176; S-RC-10-162; S-RC-10-156; S-RC-10-088; 4S-RC-10-074; S-RC-10-076; S-RC-10-078; S-RC-10-060; 5S-RC-10-070; S-RC-10-044; S-RC-10-038; S-RC-10-040; 6S-RC-10-042; S-RC-10-018; S-RC-10-024; S-RC-10-004; 7S-RC-10-006; S-RC-10-008; S-RC-10-010; S-RC-10-012; 8S-RC-09-202; S-RC-09-182; S-RC-09-180; S-RC-09-156; 9S-UC-09-196; S-UC-09-182; S-RC-08-130; S-RC-07-110; or 10S-RC-07-100. 11(Source: P.A. 102-151, eff. 7-23-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-686, eff. 6-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 136-30-23.)